Utah statutes.
75-7-813.   General powers of trustee.

(1)  A trustee, without authorization by the court, may exercise:

(a)  powers conferred by the terms of the trust; or

(b)  except as limited by the terms of the trust:

(i)  all powers over the trust property which an unmarried competent owner has over individually owned property;

(ii)  any other powers appropriate to achieve the proper investment, management, and distribution of the trust property; and

(iii)  any other powers conferred by this chapter.

(2)  The exercise of a power is subject to the fiduciary duties prescribed by this part.

